Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.87, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firearms data. new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end all data pertaining to the purchase or transfer of firearms and applications for permits to carry firearms which are collected by government entities pursuant to sections 624.712 to 624.719 are private, pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text begin (b) Data pertaining to the revocation, suspension, or voidance of a permit to carry a firearm is public data on individuals under section 13.02, subdivision 15. Notwithstanding section 13.10, data pertaining to an individual's permit to carry a firearm is public data on individuals under section 13.02, subdivision 15, if the individual permit holder either (1) dies due to suicide by firearm, or (2) dies as a result of use of force by a peace officer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.714, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Records. (a) A sheriff must not maintain records or data collected, made, or held under this section concerning any applicant or permit holder that are not necessary under this section to support a permit that is outstanding or eligible for renewal under subdivision 7, paragraph (b). Notwithstanding section 138.163, sheriffs must completely purge all files and databases by March 1 of each year to delete all information collected under this section concerning all persons who are no longer current permit holders or currently eligible to renew their permit. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to records or data concerning an applicant or permit holder whonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end has had a permit denied or revoked under the criteria established in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (1), or subdivision 6, paragraph (a), clause (3)deleted text begin , for a period of six years from the date of the denial or revocation.deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) has had a permit voided because the permit holder becomes prohibited by law from possessing a firearm; or new text end new text begin (3) dies as a result of either suicide by firearm or use of force by a peace officer. new text end new text begin (c) A sheriff must maintain records or data collected, made, or held under this section concerning any applicant or permit holder who is exempt from paragraph (a) for at least six years following the date of the denial, revocation, voidance, or actual notice to the sheriff of the death and cause of death giving rise to an exemption under paragraph (b), clause (3). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end